Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5909.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) A person shall not enter into an agreement, combination, or conspiracy to defraud the state by obtaining or aiding another to obtain the payment or allowance of a false claim under the social welfare act, Act No. 280 of the Public Acts of 1939, as amended, being sections 400.1 to 400.121 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b. (2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony. , punishable by The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for not less than 2 years and 6 months or more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $50,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.